Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-820
Mayhew Cabin historical site; Game and Parks Commission; powers.

The Game and Parks Commission may purchase or receive by donation, and subsequently rehabilitate and manage, the Mayhew Cabin historical site located in Nebraska City, Nebraska.

Laws 2023, LB531, § 54;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 154.